Missouri, session 2026, SB1699.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 523.001, 523.020, 523.030, 523.039,
523.040, 523.250, 523.253, 523.256, and 523.265, RSMo, and
section 523.061 as enacted by house bill no. 1606, one hundred
first general assembly, second regular session, and section
523.061 as enacted by house bill no. 1944, ninety-third general
assembly, second regular session, are repealed and ten new
sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
523.001, 523.015, 523.030, 523.039, 523.040, 523.061, 523.250,
523.253, 523.256, and 523.265, to read as follows:
523.001. For the purposes of this chapter, the
following terms shall mean:
(1) "Beginning farmer or rancher", an individual or
entity who:
(a) Has not operated a farm or ranch, or who has
operated a farm or ranch for not more than ten consecutive
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1699 2
years. The requirement of this paragraph applies to all
members of an entity;
(b) Participates in the operation of the farm or
ranch; and
(c) Is a resident of this state;
(2) "Beginning farmer taking", any taking of any
agricultural or horticultural property owned by a property
owner qualified as a beginning farmer or rancher;
(3) "Fair market value", the value of the property
taken after considering comparable sales in the area,
capitalization of income, and replacement cost less
depreciation, singularly or in combination, as appropriate,
and additionally considering the value of the property based
upon its highest and best use, using generally accepted
appraisal practices. If less than the entire property is
taken, fair market value shall mean the difference between
the fair market value of the entire property immediately
prior to the taking and the fair market value of the
remaining or burdened property immediately after the taking,
including consideration of the damage the condemning
authority's proposed use of the condemned property shall
cause to the remaining or burdened property if such proposed
use of the condemned property shall reduce the value of the
remaining or burdened property. The term "fair market
value" shall not include any increase in the value of the
remaining or burdened property caused by the condemning
authority's proposed use of the condemned property;
[(2)] (4) "Heritage value", the value assigned to any
real property, including but not limited to real property
owned by a business enterprise with fewer than one hundred
employees, that has been owned within the same family for

SB 1699 3
[fifty] twenty or more years, such value to be fifty percent
of fair market value;
[(3)] (5) "Homestead taking", any taking of a dwelling
owned by the property owner and functioning as the owner's
primary place of residence or any taking of the owner's
property within three hundred feet of the owner's primary
place of residence [that prevents the owner from utilizing
the property in substantially the same manner as it is
currently being utilized].
523.015. 1. Any corporation, political subdivision,
cooperative, or person with the authority to condemn
property pursuant to this chapter or any other provision of
law shall give the owner of any property at least fifteen
days written notice that surveyors employed by the
condemning corporation, political subdivision, cooperative,
or person will enter the property proposed to be condemned
for any surveying.
2. If any corporation, political subdivision,
cooperative, or person with the authority to condemn
property pursuant to this chapter or any other provision of
law acquires any easement in this state by voluntary means
or by condemnation, such corporation, political subdivision,
cooperative, or person shall give at least five days written
notice that such corporation, political subdivision,
cooperative, or person, or its agents or employees, will
enter upon the easement before entering such easement,
unless such corporation, political subdivision, cooperative,
or person has to enter onto such property in an emergency to
make repairs to avoid or remedy disruptions of utility
service, or to prevent any threat to the life or property of
any person.

SB 1699 4
3. If any corporation, political subdivision,
cooperative, or person with the authority to condemn
property pursuant to this chapter or any other provision of
law acquires any easement in this state by voluntary means
or by condemnation, and subsequently cuts or destroys any
trees or vegetation upon or within the easement, such
corporation, political subdivision, cooperative, or person
shall, at its own expense, entirely remove all such trees or
vegetation from the easement, unless otherwise agreed in
writing with the owner of the fee over which the easement
exists.
4. If any corporation, political subdivision,
cooperative, or person with the authority to condemn
property pursuant to this chapter or any other provision of
law acquires any easement in this state by voluntary means
or by condemnation, and subsequently cuts or destroys any
trees or vegetation upon or within the easement, such
corporation, political subdivision, cooperative, or person
shall, at its own expense, remove or grind all stumps in the
easement to at least three inches in depth below the ground
surface, unless otherwise agreed in writing with the owner
of the fee over which the easement exists.
5. If any corporation, political subdivision,
cooperative, or person with the authority to condemn
property pursuant to this chapter or any other provision of
law acquires any easement in this state by voluntary means
or by condemnation, and subsequently disturbs, causes damage
by equipment or machinery, or removes any tree, vegetation,
grass, earthwork, or terrace within the easement, or creates
or causes any ruts, such corporation, political subdivision,
cooperative, or person shall, at its own expense, repair and
reseed any barren area utilizing best practices for erosion

SB 1699 5
control as set forth by the Missouri soil and water
commission, unless otherwise agreed in writing with the
owner of the fee over which the easement exists.
6. If any corporation, political subdivision,
cooperative, or person with the authority to condemn
property pursuant to this chapter or any other provision of
law acquires any easement in this state by voluntary means
or by condemnation, and subsequently abandons or ceases to
utilize or maintain any plant, pipe, line, tower, or any
other facility built upon such easement, such corporation,
political subdivision, cooperative, or person shall, at its
own expense, remove from the property all above ground
components of such plant, pipe, line, tower, or any other
facility, and shall repair and reseed any barren area
utilizing best practices for erosion control as set forth by
the Missouri soil and water commission, unless otherwise
agreed in writing with the owner of the fee over which the
easement exists.
7. If any corporation, political subdivision,
cooperative, or person with the authority to condemn
property pursuant to this chapter or any other provision of
law acquires any easement in this state by voluntary means
or by condemnation, and subsequently abandons or ceases to
utilize or maintain any plant, pipe, line, tower, or any
other facility built upon such easement, such corporation,
political subdivision, cooperative, or person shall, at its
own expense, remove from the property all components of such
plant, pipe, line, tower, or any other facility located at
three feet of depth or less below ground, and shall repair
and reseed any barren area utilizing best practices for
erosion control as set forth by the Missouri soil and water

SB 1699 6
commission, unless otherwise agreed in writing with the
owner of the fee over which the easement exists.
8. If any corporation, political subdivision,
cooperative, or person with the authority to condemn
property pursuant to this chapter or any other provision of
law acquires any easement in this state by voluntary means
or by condemnation, and subsequently disturbs, causes damage
to, or removes any fence, or portion thereof, owned by the
property owner to access the easement area, such
corporation, political subdivision, cooperative, or person
shall, at its own expense, repair the fence to a lawful
state to comply with chapter 272, unless otherwise agreed in
writing with the owner of the fee over which the easement
exists.
100 9. Any corporation, political subdivision,
101 cooperative, or person with the authority to condemn
102 property pursuant to this chapter or any other provision of
103 law that violates in any material respect the provisions of
104 this section shall be liable to the owner of the property
105 over which such corporation, political subdivision,
106 cooperative, or person holds an easement for a civil penalty
107 of up to one thousand dollars for each violation for each
108 day such violation persists, except that the maximum penalty
109 for violation of the provisions of this section shall not
110 exceed one hundred thousand dollars for any related series
111 of violations. An action to recover such civil penalty may
112 be brought by any aggrieved owner of the property over which
113 an easement exists, or by the attorney general or by a
114 prosecuting attorney or circuit attorney on behalf of any
115 aggrieved owner of the property over which an easement
116 exists, in the circuit court of the county where such
117 property is located.

SB 1699 7
118 10. Any aggrieved owner of the property over which an
119 easement exists, or the attorney general or a prosecuting
120 attorney or circuit attorney, may bring an action in the
121 circuit court of the county where such property is located
122 for equitable relief to redress or restrain a violation by
123 any corporation, political subdivision, cooperative, or
124 person of any provision of this section. The court may
125 grant such relief as is necessary or appropriate, including
126 mandatory or prohibitive injunctive relief, temporary or
127 permanent.
128 11. As used in this section, the term "political
129 subdivision" means:
130 (1) Any agency or unit of this state;
131 (2) Any county of this state;
132 (3) Any municipality of this state;
133 (4) Any agency or unit authorized to levy taxes or
134 empowered to cause taxes to be levied which now is, or
135 hereafter shall be, authorized to acquire property by
136 eminent domain;
137 (5) Townships, cities, towns, villages, school, road,
138 drainage, sewer, and levee districts, and any other public
139 subdivision, public corporation, or public quasi-corporation
140 having the power to tax; or
141 (6) Any other entity empowered to exercise eminent
142 domain authority pursuant to this chapter or any other
143 provision of law.
523.030. 1. Upon the filing of the petition, a
summons shall be issued, giving such owner at least [ten]
sixty days' notice from the date of the service of such
petition of the time when said petition will be heard, which
summons shall be served by the sheriff of the county, in the
same manner as writs of summons are or may be by law

SB 1699 8
required to be served. Such petition shall not be heard
less than sixty days from the date such summons is served.
If the name or residence of the owner is unknown, or if the
owners, or any of them, do not reside within the state,
notice of the time of hearing the petition, reciting the
substance of the petition and the day fixed for the hearing
thereof, shall be given by publication once each week for
three consecutive weeks prior to the time of hearing the
petition, in a newspaper published in the county in which
the proceedings are pending, if one is published in the
county, or if no newspaper is published in the county, or
the publisher shall refuse to publish the same on tender of
his usual charges for advertising, then by posting up said
notice for three consecutive weeks at the door of the
courthouse of the county wherein the lands or any portion of
them lie.
2. Upon service of the summons as set forth in
subsection 1 of this section, the owner served shall have
thirty days after the date of service of the summons to
answer the petition by affirmation or denial of the
assertions set forth therein and assert all available
affirmative defenses. The owner may assert affirmative
defenses for fraud, bad faith, lack of statutory authority
and against any ultra vires or legally unauthorized act or
omission by the condemning authority and shall have the
standing to assert and prosecute claims for the same. If
the owner answers or sets forth affirmative defenses to the
petition, all rights of full discovery shall be afforded to
the parties as those set forth for civil cases under the
Missouri supreme court rules of civil procedure.
3. Failure of the owner to answer the petition
pursuant to subsection 2 of this section within thirty days

SB 1699 9
of service of the summons shall not be deemed a default of
the owner's rights to a hearing pursuant to this section and
section 523.040.
4. At the initial hearing of the petition as set forth
in the summons required by this section, the condemning
authority shall have the burden to prove by clear and
convincing evidence that the condemning authority has the
statutory authority to condemn the property at issue in such
petition and that such condemning authority has followed its
own enacting and empowering statutes, rules, and bylaws in
pursuing condemnation of the owner's property.
5. It is the public policy of this state that the
rights of private property owners be protected against
unlawful or abusive exercises of condemnation authority.
This chapter shall be liberally construed in favor of the
private property owner and against condemning authorities.
523.039. 1. In all eminent domain proceedings filed
after December 31, 2006, just compensation for condemned
property shall be determined under one of the [three] four
following subdivisions, whichever yields the highest
compensation, as applicable to the particular type of
property and taking:
(1) An amount equivalent to the fair market value of
such property, plus compensation equal to the amount of any
federal, state, or local taxes owed by owner of the
condemned property as a consequence of the eminent domain
proceeding, including, but not limited to, all capital gains
tax;
(2) For condemnations that result in a homestead
taking, an amount equivalent to the fair market value of
such property multiplied by one hundred twenty-five percent,
plus compensation equal to the amount of any federal, state,

SB 1699 10
or local taxes owed by owner of the condemned property as a
consequence of the eminent domain proceeding, including, but
not limited to, all capital gains tax; [or]
(3) For condemnations of property [that result in any
taking that prevents the owner from utilizing property in
substantially the same manner as it was currently being
utilized on the day of the taking and] involving property
owned within the same family for [fifty] twenty or more
years, an amount equivalent to the sum of the fair market
value and heritage value, plus compensation equal to the
amount of any federal, state, or local taxes owed by owner
of the condemned property as a consequence of the eminent
domain proceeding, including, but not limited to, all
capital gains tax. For the purposes of this subdivision,
family ownership of property may be established through
evidence of ownership by children, grandchildren, siblings,
or nephews or nieces of the family member owning the
property [fifty] twenty years prior to the taking; and in
addition, may be established through marriage or adoption by
such family members. If any entity owns the real property,
members of the family shall have an ownership interest in
more than fifty percent of the entity in order to be within
the family line of ownership for the purposes of this
subdivision. The property owner shall have the burden of
proving to the commissioners or court that the property has
been owned within the same family for [fifty] twenty or more
years; or
(4) For condemnations that result in a beginning
farmer taking, an amount equivalent to the fair market value
of such property multiplied by one hundred twenty-five
percent plus compensation equal to the amount of any
federal, state, or local taxes owed by the owner of the

SB 1699 11
condemned property as a consequence of the eminent domain
proceeding, including, but not limited to, all capital gains
tax.
2. For eminent domain proceedings of any agricultural
or horticultural property by an electrical corporation as
defined in section 386.020, except for an electrical
corporation operating under a cooperative business plan as
described in section 393.110, for the purposes of
constructing an electric plant subject to a certificate of
convenience and necessity under subsection 1 of section
393.170 just compensation shall be an amount equivalent to
fair market value multiplied by one hundred fifty percent,
as determined by the court, plus compensation equal to the
amount of any federal, state, or local taxes owed by owner
of the condemned property as consequence of the eminent
domain proceeding, including, but not limited to, all
capital gains tax. The provisions of this subsection shall
not apply to applications filed pursuant to section 393.170
prior to August 28, 2022.
523.040. 1. The court, or judge thereof in vacation,
on being satisfied that due notice of the pendency of the
petition has been given, and that the condemning authority
has proven by clear and convincing evidence that the
condemning authority has the statutory authority to condemn
the property at issue in such petition and that such
condemning authority has followed its own enacting and
empowering statutes, rules, and bylaws in pursuing
condemnation of the owner's property as set forth in section
523.030, shall appoint three disinterested commissioners,
who shall be residents of the county in which the real
estate or a part thereof is situated, and in any city not
within a county, any county with a charter form of

SB 1699 12
government and with more than one million inhabitants, or
any county with a charter form of government and with more
than six hundred thousand but fewer than seven hundred
thousand inhabitants at least one of the commissioners shall
be either a licensed real estate broker or a state-licensed
or state-certified real estate appraiser, to assess the
damages which the owners may severally sustain by reason of
such appropriation, who, within forty-five days after
appointment by the court, which forty-five days may be
extended by the court to a date certain with good cause
shown, after applying the definition of fair market value
contained in subdivision (1) of section 523.001, and after
having viewed the property, shall return to the clerk of
such court, under oath, their report in duplicate of such
assessment of damages, setting forth the amount of damages
allowed to the person or persons named as owning or claiming
the tract of land condemned, and should more than one tract
be condemned in the petition, then the damages allowed to
the owner, owners, claimant or claimants of each tract,
respectively, shall be stated separately, together with a
specific description of the tracts for which such damages
are assessed; and the clerk shall file one copy of said
report in his office and record the same in the order book
of the court, and he shall deliver the other copy, duly
certified by him, to the recorder of deeds of the county
where the land lies (or to the recorder of deeds of the City
of St. Louis, if the land lies in said city) who shall
record the same in his office, and index each tract
separately as provided in section 59.440, and the fee for so
recording shall be taxed by the clerk as costs in the
proceedings; and thereupon such company shall pay to the
clerk the amount thus assessed for the party in whose favor

SB 1699 13
such damages have been assessed; and on making such payment
it shall be lawful for such company to hold the interest in
the property so appropriated for the uses prescribed in this
section; and upon failure to pay the assessment, the court
may, upon motion and notice by the party entitled to such
damages, enforce the payment of the same by execution,
unless the said company shall, within ten days from the
return of such assessment, elect to abandon the proposed
appropriation of any parcel of land, by an instrument in
writing to that effect, to be filed with the clerk of the
court, and entered on the minutes of the court, and as to so
much as is thus abandoned, the assessment of damages shall
be void.
2. Prior to the issuance of any report under
subsection 1 of this section, a commissioner shall notify
all parties named in the condemnation petition no less than
ten days prior to the commissioners' viewing of the property
of the named parties' opportunity to accompany the
commissioners on the commissioners' viewing of the property
and of the named parties' opportunity to present information
to the commissioners.
3. The commissioners shall view the property, hear
arguments, and review other relevant information that may be
offered by the parties.
4. In any eminent domain proceeding involving
agricultural or horticultural property, for purposes of
constructing an electric plant subject to a certificate of
convenience and necessity under subsection 1 of section
393.170 at least one of the disinterested commissioners
appointed by the court shall be a farmer who has been
engaged in farming, as defined in section 350.010, for a
minimum of ten years in the county where such property is

SB 1699 14
situated. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply
to applications filed pursuant to section 393.170 prior to
August 28, 2022.
[523.061. After the filing of the
commissioners' report pursuant to section
523.040, the circuit judge presiding over the
condemnation proceeding shall apply the
provisions of section 523.039 and shall
determine whether a homestead taking has
occurred and shall determine whether heritage
value is payable and shall increase the
commissioners' award to provide for the
additional compensation due where a homestead
taking occurs or where heritage value applies,
in accordance with the just compensation
provisions of section 523.039. If a jury trial
of exceptions occurs under section 523.060 and
the circuit judge presiding over the
condemnation proceeding has determined that a
homestead taking has occurred or heritage value
is payable, the circuit judge presiding over the
condemnation proceeding shall apply the
provisions of section 523.039 and shall increase
the jury verdict to provide for the additional
compensation due where a homestead taking occurs
or where heritage value applies, in accordance
with the just compensation provisions of section
523.039. Notwithstanding any other provision of
law in sections 523.001 to 523.286 to the
contrary, a circuit judge who determines that
heritage value is payable as provided in this
section shall not increase the commissioners'
award or jury verdict to provide for the
additional compensation due where heritage value
applies if the plaintiff is a city, town, or
village that is incorporated in accordance with
the laws of this state and the plaintiff moves
for exclusion of the heritage value and shows
after an evidentiary hearing by a preponderance
of the evidence that the property taken has been:
(1) Abandoned;

SB 1699 15
(2) Declared a nuisance and been ordered
to be vacated;
(3) Demolished or repaired after notice
and hearing; or
(4) Materially and negatively contributed
to a blighted area as that term is defined in
section 99.805.]
523.061. After the filing of the commissioners' report
pursuant to section 523.040, the circuit judge presiding
over the condemnation proceeding shall apply the provisions
of section 523.039 and shall determine whether a homestead
taking or beginning farmer taking has occurred and shall
determine whether heritage value is payable and shall
increase the commissioners' award to provide for the
additional compensation due where a homestead taking or
beginning farmer taking occurs or where heritage value
applies, in accordance with the just compensation provisions
of section 523.039. If a jury trial of exceptions occurs
under section 523.060 and the circuit judge presiding over
the condemnation proceeding has determined that a homestead
taking or beginning farmer taking has occurred or that the
heritage value is payable, the circuit judge presiding over
the condemnation proceeding shall apply the provisions of
section 523.039 and [shall determine whether a homestead
taking has occurred and shall determine whether heritage
value is payable and] shall increase the jury verdict to
provide for the additional compensation due where a
homestead taking or beginning farmer taking occurs or where
heritage value applies, in accordance with the just
compensation provisions of section 523.039.
523.250. 1. At least sixty days before filing of a
condemnation petition seeking to acquire an interest in real
property, the condemning authority shall provide the owner

SB 1699 16
of record of such property with a written notice concerning
the intended acquisition. Such notice shall include:
(1) Identification of the interest in real property to
be acquired and a statement of the legal description or
commonly known location of the property;
(2) The purpose or purposes for which the property is
to be acquired;
(3) A statement that the property owner has the right
to:
(a) Seek legal counsel at the owner's expense;
(b) Make a counteroffer and engage in further
negotiations;
(c) Obtain such owner's own appraisal of just
compensation;
(d) Have just compensation determined preliminarily by
court-appointed condemnation commissioners and, ultimately,
by a jury;
(e) Seek assistance from the office of the ombudsman
for property rights created under section 523.277;
(f) Contest the right to condemn in the condemnation
proceeding; [and]
(g) Exercise the rights to request vacation of an
easement under the procedures and circumstances provided for
in section 527.188;
(h) Seek an award for heritage value, a homestead
taking, or a beginning farmer taking pursuant to sections
523.001, 523.039, and 523.061; and
(i) Seek attorney's fees pursuant to section 523.253
if the amount awarded to the property owner by the
commissioners or jury is greater than the offer made by the
condemning authority; and

SB 1699 17
(4) A copy of section 523.015 and the list of
obligations and remedies set forth in section 523.015.
An owner may waive the requirements of this subsection
prescribed above in a writing executed by the owner.
2. The written notice required by this section shall
be deposited in the United States mail, certified or
registered, and with postage prepaid, addressed to the owner
of record as listed in the office of the city or county
assessor for the city or county in which the property is
located. The receipt issued to the condemning authority by
the United States Post Office for certified or registered
mail shall constitute proof of compliance with this notice
requirement; provided, however, that nothing in this section
shall preclude a condemning authority from proving
compliance with this notice requirement by other competent
evidence.
523.253. 1. A condemning authority shall present a
written offer to all owners of record of the property. The
offer must be made at least thirty days before filing a
condemnation petition and shall be held open for the thirty-
day period unless an agreement is reached sooner. The
written offer presented pursuant to this section shall also
include a notice that all owners of record may seek an award
for heritage value, a homestead taking, or a beginning
farmer taking pursuant to sections 523.001, 523.039, and
523.061, a notice that all owners of record have the right
to pursue attorney's fees pursuant to subsection 3 of this
section, and a copy of section 523.015 and the list of
obligations and remedies set forth in section 523.015. The
offer shall be deposited in the United States mail,
certified or registered, and with postage prepaid, addressed

SB 1699 18
to the owner of record as listed in the office of the city
or county assessor for the city or county in which the
property is located. The receipt issued to the condemning
authority by the United States [Post Office] Postal Service
for certified or registered mail shall constitute proof of
compliance with this requirement; provided, however, that
nothing in this section shall preclude a condemning
authority from proving compliance with this requirement by
other competent evidence. Nothing in this section shall
prohibit the parties from negotiating during the thirty-day
period.
2. (1) Any condemning authority shall, at the time of
the offer, provide the property owner with an appraisal or
an explanation with supporting financial data for its
determination of the value of the property for purposes of
the offer made in subsection 1 of this section.
(2) Any appraisal referred to in this section shall be
made by a state-licensed or state-certified appraiser using
generally accepted appraisal practices.
3. In any condemnation proceeding, if the amount
awarded by the commissioners or jury is greater than the
offer made by the condemning authority pursuant to this
section, the court shall award attorney's fees to the
property owner in addition to the award in such proceeding.
523.256. Before a court may enter an order of
condemnation, the court shall find that the condemning
authority engaged in good faith negotiations prior to filing
the condemnation petition. A condemning authority shall be
deemed to have engaged in good faith negotiations if:
(1) It has properly and timely given all notices to
owners required by this chapter;

SB 1699 19
(2) Its offer under section 523.253 was no lower than
the amount reflected in an appraisal performed by a state-
licensed or state-certified appraiser for the condemning
authority, provided an appraisal is given to the owner
pursuant to subsection 2 of section 523.253 or, in other
cases, the offer is no lower than the amount provided in the
basis for its determination of the value of the property as
provided to the owner under subsection 2 of section 523.253;
(3) For condemnation of any agricultural or
horticultural property for the construction of an electrical
transmission line [designed to transmit electricity at three
hundred forty-five kilovolts or greater], but not for
condemnation of such property by an electrical corporation
operating under a cooperative business plan as described in
section 393.110, for the purposes of constructing an
electric plant subject to a certificate of convenience and
necessity under subsection 1 of section 393.170, the total
compensation package offered was no lower than the amount
reflected in an appraisal performed by a state-licensed or
state-certified appraiser for the condemning authority
multiplied by one hundred fifty percent. The provisions of
this subdivision shall not apply to applications filed
pursuant to section 393.170 prior to August 28, 2022;
(4) The owner has been given an opportunity to obtain
his or her own appraisal from a state-licensed or state-
certified appraiser of his or her choice; and
(5) Where applicable, it has considered an alternate
location suggested by the owner under section 523.265.
If the court does not find that good faith negotiations have
occurred, the court shall dismiss the condemnation petition,
without prejudice, and shall order the condemning authority

SB 1699 20
to reimburse the owner for his or her actual reasonable
attorneys' fees and costs incurred with respect to the
condemnation proceeding which has been dismissed.
523.265. With regard to property interests acquired by
condemnation or negotiations in lieu of the exercise
thereof, within thirty days of receiving a written notice
sent under section 523.250, the landowner may propose to the
condemning authority in writing an alternative location for
the property to be condemned, which alternative location
shall be on the same parcel of the landowner's property as
the property the condemning authority seeks to condemn. The
proposal shall describe the alternative location in such
detail that the alternative location is clearly defined for
the condemning authority. The condemning authority shall
consider all such alternative locations. This section shall
not apply to takings of an entire parcel of land. A written
statement by the condemning authority to the landowner that
it has considered all such alternative locations, and
[briefly stating] setting forth with specificity why they
were rejected or accepted, is conclusive evidence that
sufficient consideration was given to the alternative
locations. Any rejection of the landowner's suggested
alternative location shall not be arbitrary or capricious or
induced by fraud, collusion, or bad faith and shall be
supported by substantial evidence. A condemning authority
or the affected landowner may seek a determination as to
whether these standards have been met by a court of
competent jurisdiction in any condemnation action filed to
acquire the owner's property or in an action seeking a
declaratory judgment.
[523.020. Any number of owners, residents
in the same county or circuit, may be joined in

SB 1699 21
one petition, and the damages to each shall be
separately assessed by the same commissioners.]
✓